North Dakota, session 69, HB1578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 23.1-15-07 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If a commercial towing service takes custody of an abandoned motor vehicle and the vehicle
is not reclaimed under section 23.1-15-06, the commercial towing service may obtain a
release from the department of transportation which is sufficient title to dispose of the vehicle.
The release entitles the commercial towing service to register the vehicle and receive a
certificate of title, free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership. The department of
transportation may not assess motor vehicle excise tax under section 57 - 40.3 - 02 on a motor
vehicle transferred under this subsection. The license plates displayed on the abandoned
vehicle must be removed and destroyed upon receipt of the new title.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 57-40.3-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Any motor vehicle transferred under subsection 2 of section 23.1 - 15 - 07 .

H. B. NO. 1578 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1578.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 1 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State